District of Columbia statutes.
31-4709

Policy provisions required by foreign government entities.

The policies of a life company, not organized under the laws of the District, may contain any provisions prescribed by the laws of the state, territory, district, or country, under which the company is organized. The policies of a life company, organized under the laws of the District, may, when issued or delivered in any state, territory, district, or country, contain any provisions required by the laws of the state, territory, district, or country in which the same are issued or delivered, anything in this subdivision to the contrary notwithstanding.

History

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1164, ch. 672, ch. V, § 9

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-513.
1973 Ed., § 35-709.